District of Columbia statutes.
7-2502.04

Fingerprints and photographs of applicants; application in person required.

(a)

The Chief shall require any person applying for a registration certificate to be fingerprinted in order to conduct an efficient and adequate investigation into the matters described in § 7-2502.03 and to effectuate the purposes of this unit. The Chief shall maintain a record of the fingerprints of sufficient quality to enable periodic investigation to ensure compliance with § 7-2502.03.

(b)

The Chief shall take a digitalized, full-face photograph of each applicant, other than an organization, to be included as part of a person’s firearms registration application. The photo shall be taken simultaneously with the filing of the application.

(c)

Every applicant (or in the case of an organization, the president or chief executive, or a person authorized in writing by him), shall appear in person at a time and place prescribed by the Chief, and may be required to bring with him the firearm for which a registration certificate is sought, which shall be transported in accordance with § 22-4504.02.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title II, § 204, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-62, § 2, 24 DCR 5780
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-372, § 3(e), 56 DCR 1365
Sept. 29, 2012, D.C. Law 19-170, § 2(e), 59 DCR 5691
1981 Ed., § 6-2314.
1973 Ed., § 6-1814.
D.C. Law 17-372, in subsec. (a), substituted “6 years” for “5 years”; and, in subsec. (c), substituted “shall be transported in accordance with § 22-4504.02” for “shall be unloaded and securely wrapped, and carried in open view”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-170 rewrote (a) and (b).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(e) of Firearms Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-651, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 911).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of Firearms Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-352, May 11, 2012, 59 DCR 5116).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Firearms Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-394, July 18, 2012, 59 DCR 8694).
For temporary amendment of (a) and (b), see § 2(e) of the Firearms Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-510, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12808).